Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 1. Mississippi River Bridge Revenue Bond Law.
§ 65-25-51.
Appointment, term, and compensation of members.

The board of supervisors of such county or the governing authority of such city shall appoint the members of such commission. In making the first appointments, one (1) member shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year, one (1) member for a term of two (2) years, one (1) member for a term of three (3) years, one (1) member for a term of four (4) years, and one (1) member for a term of five (5) years. If the governing authorities shall elect to continue an existing commission in effect, then the order so providing shall reappoint the membership of such commission for varying terms of from one (1) to five (5) years, as hereinabove provided in cases of a newly established commission and, thereafter, their successors shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years. Said governing authorities shall, by resolution entered upon their minutes, prescribe the duties, powers, and rights of such commission and provide for the reasonable compensation, if any, of such commissioners. The acts of such commissioners shall regularly, and not less than four (4) times each year, be reported to such governing body and be subject to its approval and concurrence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8469.5-02; Laws, 1966, ch. 315, § 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 392, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1975).

§ 65-25-53.
Authority of commission.

The commissioners appointed by such governing body or municipality, or the commissioners whose terms are continued in force as above authorized, shall, subject to the approval of such governing body, have the following authority, powers, and rights: Said commission shall manage and control the affairs of the bridge as a separate proprietary venture, apart from other public roads and bridges within the county, and shall provide for the regular inspection, repair, maintenance, and upkeep of said bridge and its approaches, which expenses and all liabilities which may exist or later come into being or be claimed to exist shall be wholly borne from the bridge properties themselves and the revenues received from the lease of such properties to private or public utilities. In connection with operating the affairs of the said bridge and maintaining the same, said commission is vested with the following powers and authority, subject to the veto power or approval of the governing body owning the said bridge, viz: (1) Contracts and purchases shall be made on the same basis and under the same requirements of advertisement for bids as those made by the board of supervisors; (2) the commissioners may employ a superintendent or manager of the bridge properties and fix the amount of his salary, and either employ or delegate to said manager the employment of subordinate personnel and provide for the wages and compensation of such employees, and, should the commission so determine, may require the manager or other employees to post bond in such sum as the commission may designate for the faithful discharge of their duties as such employees; however, the number of persons employed in an election year shall not exceed the average number employed during the preceding three (3) years, except that additional employees may be hired on a temporary basis in cases of emergency when the specific reasons therefor shall be entered on the minutes of the commission; (3) provide for an adequate bookkeeping system pertinent to the affairs of said bridge and for regular audits, with the revenues derived following the freeing of said bridge to vehicular traffic, if any there be over and above cost of operating and maintaining the said bridge, to be kept by the clerk of the said board or treasurer of the said municipality in a separate account and to so remain, properly invested in the same manner as sinking funds of the county or municipality may be invested, said assets to be subject to bear and discharge the liabilities of the said bridge and not to be utilized for any other or different purpose until a period of at least five (5) years following the freeing of the said bridge from tolls (unless sooner there be another free bridge constructed and opened to public travel crossing said Mississippi River located not more than one (1) mile from said bridge, in which event that factor, rather than the five-year time limit, shall be determinative), and then not until a determination is made by the board or governing authority that such funds, to the extent amassed, will not be further needed for operational maintenance purposes; and that said audits thus caused to be made shall be done by a certified public accountant or accountants duly qualified under the laws of this state; (4) that, without in anywise sacrificing or waiving the entire exempt status of the said bridge properties from ad valorem taxation, to pay a sum or sums in lieu of ad valorem taxes which, by agreement with the taxing authorities of this or any neighboring state, will in no event exceed in any year a sum equaling more than one-half (1/2) of the average amount paid per year by way of such taxes or in lieu thereof over the five-year period preceding June 15, 1966; (5) employ nationally recognized engineers and such other professional assistance as may be deemed necessary, and to pay reasonable compensation for such services; (6) to have and exercise any other authority and right conferred by existing laws, state or federal, applicable to the operation of such bridge; and (7) fulfill the requirements of any outstanding lease contracts to the extent that the bridge properties will permit and the revenues to be derived from such leases will allow, but without incurring any pecuniary liability on the part of the governing authorities or taxpayers generally.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8469.5-03; Laws, 1966, ch. 315, § 3; Laws, 1975, ch. 392, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1975).

§ 65-25-55.
Obligation in connection with operation of bridge.

The governing body of such county or city shall cause to be kept separate minutes and records of the operation of such bridge properties available for public inspection, which minutes from time to time shall show the approval or disapproval of the actions of said commission. Concerning the management and operation of said bridge by the commission and the governing body of said city or county, there shall be no obligation on said commission, nor shall there be any general obligation on said city or county, other than from the revenues to be derived from the operation of said bridge properties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8469.5-04; Laws, 1966, ch. 315, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved June 15, 1966).

§ 65-25-57.
Limitation on costs of managing bridge properties.

The said commission shall serve at the pleasure of the governing body of the political subdivision. Should said governing body not create the said commission, or should it determine following its creation to revoke the authority of and terminate the said commission, then the powers and authority hereby reposed shall vest in and be exercised by such governing body, the board of supervisors of said county or the governing authority of said city. Such governing body shall by appropriate order fix or approve the rules and regulations of the commission which shall assure that all the costs of administering the bridge properties shall be exclusively borne from bridge revenues and not from any funds derived from taxation; and said governing authority shall by appropriate order fix or approve the compensation, if any, of the commissioners and the extra fees and reasonable allowances to be paid to the clerk of said governing authority to reasonably compensate such clerk for the extra services and work hereby required. The combined total of all of such costs of administering and handling said funds, as above in this section particularized, shall not exceed seven and one-half percent (71/2%) of the aggregate sum of the funds received from such bridge revenues and regulated by the provisions hereof; if the commission not be created or be discontinued, such percentage shall be not more than five percent (5%), and no member of the board of supervisors or governing body of such municipality shall be authorized by Sections 65-25-49 through 65-25-61 to receive any additional compensation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8469.5-05; Laws, 1966, ch. 315, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved June 15, 1966).

§ 65-25-59.
Audit.

The bridge commission shall be subject to the same type of audit as the boards of supervisors of the counties of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8469.5-06; Laws, 1966, ch. 315, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved June 15, 1966).

§ 65-25-61.
Law supplemental to other statutes.

Sections 65-25-49 through 65-25-61 shall be in addition to and supplemental to all other laws pertinent to the operation of said bridge but, to the extent the subjects herein contained are covered in such prior enactments, the cited sections and the enactments hereof shall be deemed to supersede such former laws and enactments.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8469.5-07; Laws, 1966, ch. 315, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved June 15, 1966).

§ 65-25-63.
Payment to municipality in lieu of taxes.

The governing authorities of any county which has heretofore issued bridge revenue bonds or bridge revenue refunding bonds for the purpose of acquiring a combined highway and railway bridge over the Mississippi River as authorized under the provisions of Sections 65-25-1 through 65-25-41 may, in their discretion and in lieu of taxes, annually pay to any municipality of this state in which the portion of said bridge properties lying within the State of Mississippi are located a sum not exceeding that required to be paid and paid by way of ad valorem taxes for the year 1961 within or to a sister state or the political subdivisions thereof. Such payment or payments in lieu of taxes as are hereby authorized and as may be determined upon by the board of supervisors of any county owning such bridge, concurred in by any commission appointed under authority of Sections 65-25-43 through 65-25-47, to have control over the affairs of said bridge, shall be made from any fund created by such bond resolution or indenture enabling the caring for of contingencies not otherwise provided for. However, in no event shall such payment or payments impair any debt service fund or debt service reserve fund or lessen the minimum amount by said bond resolution or indenture required to be carried in any debt service fund or debt service reserve fund created by said resolution or indenture.

The municipality, upon receipt of such payment or payments, must treat and account for the same just as though and as if such funds had been received from ad valorem taxation for general municipal purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8469.7; Laws, 1962, ch. 264, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1962).